Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB850.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(3) of the act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, No.150), known as the Childhood Blood Lead Test Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Legislative purpose.The purposes of this act are:* * *(3) To [encourage] require the testing of all children in this Commonwealth by two years of age so that prompt diagnosis and treatment, as well as the prevention of harm, are possible.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Cost-sharing." As follows:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an insured pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes deductibles, coinsurance, copayments and similar charges.(3) The term does not include premiums, balance billed amounts from an out-of-network health care provider or the cost of noncovered services.* * *Section 3. Section 5 heading and (a) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 5. Lead poisoning prevention, assessment and testing requirements.[(a) Lead testing for children.--(1) The following apply:(i) A health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure in an individual patient by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age.(ii) If a patient has never been tested in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for 20250SB0850PN0988 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age, a health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in an individual patient between 24 months and 72 months of age.(iii) A health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient's parent or legal guardian understands the risks and benefits of blood lead testing prior to obtaining consent.(2) If a patient's parent or legal guardian consents to blood lead testing for the patient under paragraph (1) and the results of a capillary blood lead test indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test after obtaining the consent of the patient's parent or legal guardian.](a.1) Lead testing requirements for children.-- (1) A health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient under the health care provider's care receives at least one blood lead test by 24 months of age or the age of 24 through 72 months if the patient has never been tested.(2) If the results of a capillary blood lead test indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention . * * *(d) Nonapplicability.--The requirements under this section shall not apply if a child's parent or legal guardian or a 20250SB0850PN0988 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 patient under prenatal care objects to the blood lead test . Section 4. Section 7 of the act is amended to read:Section 7. Blood lead assessment and testing coverage.(a) General rule.--A health insurance policy or government program covered under this section shall provide to covered individuals or recipients blood lead tests as follows:(1) In the case of individuals or recipients who are pregnant, one blood lead test per pregnancy if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention [and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists].(2) In the case of individuals or recipients who are:(i) under two years of age, at least one blood lead test by 24 months of age. [in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics and, if](ii) the age of 24 through 72 months, at least one blood lead test by the age of 72 months if the individual or recipient has never been tested.(3) If the result of the blood level test under paragraph (1) or (2) indicates an elevated blood lead level, another blood lead test [by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the blood level test in which the elevated blood lead level was indicated.] to confirm the blood lead level in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.(b) [Copayments, deductibles and coinsurance.--Coverage under this section shall be subject to copayment, deductible and coinsurance provisions and any other general exclusions or 20250SB0850PN0988 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limitations of a health insurance policy or government program to the same extent as other medical services covered by the policy or program are subject to these provisions.] Cost sharing.--A blood lead test covered under subsection (a) may not be subject to cost-sharing.(c) Construction.--This section shall not be construed as limiting benefits which are otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance policy or government program.Section 5. The amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, the amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, the amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0850PN0988 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223